Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4348.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 2,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 2,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) FAIRS AND EXPOSITIONS Purses and supplements ? fairs/licensed tracks $ 2,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,000,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Agriculture equine industry development fund 2,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2024-2025 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $2,000,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for purses and supplements - fairs/licensed tracks must be used for purses for standardbred harness horse races offered by fairs and races at licensed pari-mutuel racetracks, in accordance with section 20 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.320. 1 2 3 4 (2) If there is no standardbred race meeting licensee in this state by July 1, 2025, an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 may be designated for races run at a county fair exclusively for 2-year-old and 3-year-old Michigan sired standardbred horses.